Utah statutes.
75-2-902.   Duty of custodian of will -- Liability.

After the death of a testator and on request of an interested person, a person having custody of a will of the testator shall deliver it with reasonable promptness to a person able to secure its probate or to an appropriate court.  A person who wilfully fails to deliver a will is liable to any person aggrieved for any damages that may be sustained by the failure.  A person who wilfully refuses or fails to deliver a will after being ordered by the court in a proceeding brought for the purpose of compelling delivery is subject to penalty for contempt of court.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 39, 1998 General Session

